src/scripts/Georgian/tok.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

source ../English/letters.foma
clear
source ../Russian/letters.foma
clear
source g2p.foma
clear
define Vowel TranscribeVowel.u;
define Consonant TranscribeConsonant.u;
define Letter Vowel|Consonant|SmallEnglishLetter|CapitalEnglishLetter|SmallRussianLetter|CapitalRussianLetter;
define LetterSequence Consonant+;

define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;
define Digit %0|NZDigit;

define Number %0 | [NZDigit Digit*];

define Word Letter+ ;

define Stage1 
Number @-> ... num || _ ,, 
Word @-> ... word || _ .#. | \Letter ,, 
\[Letter | Digit] @-> ... sym || _ ; 

define Stage2 
word -> lseq || [.#.|word|num|sym] LetterSequence _ ,, 
num -> dig || Digit^12 _ ;

regex Stage1 .o. Stage2;
